Alabama, session 2026rs, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Pursuant to the Alabama Sunset Law, the
Sunset Committee recommends the continuance of the State Board
of Registration for Foresters until October 1, 2030.
Section 2. The existence and functioning of the State
Board of Registration for Foresters, created and functioning
pursuant to Sections 34-12-1 to 34-12-37, inclusive, Code of
Alabama 1975, is continued until October 1, 2030, and those
code sections are expressly preserved.
Section 3. The Legislature concurs in the
recommendations of the Sunset Committee as provided in
Sections 1 and 2.
Section 4. This act shall become effective June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
SB122 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB122
Senate 15-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 19-Feb-26




By: Senator Stewart
Page 2